District of Columbia statutes.
2-219.03a

Special hiring agreements.

(a)

Whenever the Mayor determines that the goal of increasing employment opportunities for District residents may be better served by establishing hiring goals in specific job categories for specific government-assisted projects or contracts, the Mayor may enter into agreements with beneficiaries or their contractors and subcontractors to provide for increased hiring in specific job categories. Compliance with this agreement shall be deemed compliance with the requirements of this part. Non-compliance with this agreement shall be treated in the same manner as a violation of any other requirement of this part.

(b)

The Mayor may direct the Director of each District agency, the Chief Procurement Officer, or each District contracting officer to develop and report on performance goals for each District agency in furtherance of the objectives of this part.

June 29, 1984, D.C. Law 5-93, § 4a
as added June 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-118, § 302(b), 53 DCR 2602
Feb. 24, 2012, D.C. Law 19-84, § 2(c), 58 DCR 11170
Delegation of Authority pursuant to D.C. Law 16-118, the “Way to Work Amendment Act of 2006”, see Mayor’s Order 2006-122, September 27, 2006 ( 53 DCR 9313).
D.C. Law 19-84 substituted “government-assisted project or contract” for “government-assisted project”.